District of Columbia statutes.
15-356

Optional procedure.

The right of a judgment creditor to bring an action to enforce a judgment in lieu of proceeding under this subchapter remains unimpaired.

Oct. 2, 1990, D.C. Law 8-173, § 2(b), 37 DCR 5005
1981 Ed., § 15-356.
Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 6 of the Uniform Enforcement of Foreign Judgments Act (1964).